Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2004.11
Back the Blue Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Back the Blue Cash Fund is created and shall be administered by the Nebraska State Patrol. The fund shall consist of gifts, grants, bequests, money received from any public or private source, money credited pursuant to section 60-3,163.02, and money transferred to the fund by the Legislature.

(2) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any interest or realized capital gains from any such investment shall be credited to the Back the Blue Cash Fund.

(3)(a) The fund shall only be used pursuant to this section.

(b) The Nebraska State Patrol may award grants from the fund pursuant to section 81-2004.12.

(c) The fund shall not be used for buying any equipment for or paying any salary or cost for the Nebraska State Patrol.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 80.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.